Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8312
Facility regulation system; periodic review.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall periodically examine and reexamine the regulations, processes, and results of the facility regulation system. Changes in the facility regulation system should occur whenever the department finds that:

(1) A program or procedure is not needed to ensure the protection of the public health, safety, or welfare or a program or procedure is not providing adequate protection of the public health, safety, or welfare;

(2) A program or procedure has been more detrimental than beneficial to the fulfillment of the department's regulatory responsibilities as defined by law or has diminished the supply of qualified providers or the public's access to needed services; or

(3) There are alternatives to a program or procedure that would more cost effectively fulfill the department's duties and responsibilities.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 118;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 693.